Hawaii statutes.
[§556A-10] Disclosure of other digital
assets of principal. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, directed by
the principal, or provided by a power of attorney, a custodian shall disclose
to an agent with specific authority over digital assets or general authority to
act on behalf of a principal a catalogue of electronic communications sent or
received by the principal and digital assets, other than the content of
electronic communications, of the principal if the agent gives the custodian:

(1) A written request for disclosure in physical or
electronic form;

(2) An original or a copy of the power of attorney
that gives the agent specific authority over digital assets or general
authority to act on behalf of the principal;

(3) A certification by the agent, under penalty of
perjury, that the power of attorney is in effect; and

(4) If requested by the custodian:

(A) A number, username, address, or other
unique subscriber or account identifier assigned by the custodian to identify
the principal's account; or

(B) Evidence linking the account to the
principal. [L 2016, c 162, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next